District of Columbia statutes.
9-1115.04

Compact provisions as law.

The following articles of the Compact set forth in § 9-1115.03 shall be a part of the law of the District of Columbia as in the case of any other act on the effective date of the Compact as described in Article V of Title I: Articles I, II, III, and VIII of Title I; and Articles I through XIII of Title II. Upon termination of the Compact as set forth in § 9-1115.03, the foregoing articles shall be repealed, and any other laws of the District superseded or suspended by virtue of conflict with these articles shall be reactivated without further legislative action.

Feb. 28, 1996, D.C. Law 11-96, § 5, 42 DCR 7185
1981 Ed., § 1-2484.
For temporary (225 day) authority of Mayor to execute Compact, see § 2 of Potomac River Bridges Towing Compact Temporary Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-4, May 28, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 5304).
For temporary addition of § 1-2485.1 1981 Ed., see § 2 of the Potomac River Bridges Towing Compact Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-16, February 10, 1999, 46 DCR 2349).
For temporary authorization for the District to remove disabled vehicles from any portion of the Potomac River Bridges, see §§ 2-6 of the Potomac River Bridges Towing Compact Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-16, February 10, 1999, 46 DCR 2349).
For temporary (90-day) authorization of continued participation in related compact, see §§ 2 to 6 of the Potomac River Bridges Towing Compact Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-88, June 4, 1999, 46 DCR 5319).
For temporary (90-day) authorization of continued participation in related compact, see §§ 2 to 6 of the Potomac River Bridges Towing Compact Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-222, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 470).